North Carolina, session 2025, SB209.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 132-1.11A reads as rewritten:
"§ 132-1.11A. Limited access to identifying information of minors participating in local
government programs and programs funded by the North Carolina Partnership
for Children, Inc., or a local partnership in certain localities.
(a) A public record, as defined by G.S. 132-1, does not include, as to any minor
participating in a program sponsored by a local government or combination of local governments,
a program funded by the North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc., under G.S. 143B-168.12,
or a program funded by a local partnership under G.S. 143B-168.14, any of the following
information as to that minor participant: (i) name, (ii) address, (iii) age, (iv) date of birth, (v)
telephone number, (vi) the name or address of that minor participant's parent or legal guardian,
(vii) e-mail address, or (viii) any other identifying information on an application to participate in
such program or other records related to that program. Notwithstanding this subsection, the name
of a minor who has received a scholarship or other local government-funded award of a financial
nature from a local government is a public record.
(b) The county, municipality, and zip code of residence of each participating minor
covered by subsection (a) of this section is a public record, with the information listed in
subsection (a) of this section redacted.
(c) Nothing in this section makes the information listed in subsection (a) of this section
confidential information.
(d) This section applies to the County of Chatham, Counties of Chatham and Durham,
the Towns of Apex, Cary, Fuquay-Varina, Garner, Holly Springs, Knightdale, Morrisville,
Rolesville, Wake Forest, Wendell, and Zebulon, and the City of Raleigh only."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*S209-v-1*